Illinois, session 104th, HB5510.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Student Online Personal Protection Act is 5amended by adding Section 37 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 85/37 new)7    Sec. 37. Private right of action. A student, school, or 8parent that has been injured or aggrieved by a violation of 9this Act may bring an action in a court of competent 10jurisdiction against the person or entity that violated this 11Act. This Section does not limit the Attorney General's 12enforcement authority under Section 35.